Louisiana, session 2026, SB297.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1464(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1464. Rate filing
* * *
D.(1) All rates, supplementary rate information, and any supporting
information filed pursuant to this Subpart shall be open to public inspection upon
expiration of the notification period as applicable pursuant to R.S. 22:1451, or upon
disapproval, except for information that is confidential, trade secret, or proprietary.
The determination of whether such information is in fact confidential, trade secret,
or proprietary shall be made by the commissioner in accordance with the
provisions of this Subsection.
(2)(a) If the commissioner receives a request for any information which has
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-484 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 297
been marked by the insurer or filer as confidential, trade secret, or proprietary, prior
to disclosure, the commissioner shall notify the insurer or filer in writing of the
request and the commissioner's determination of whether or not the information so
requested is subject to disclosure.
(b) Within ten days of receipt of the notification, the insurer or filer may
request a hearing before the division of administrative law in accordance with R.S.
22:2191 et seq. In the event of a hearing request, the commissioner's determination
as to whether the information is confidential, trade secret, or proprietary shall be
stayed.
(c) Any action brought pursuant to this Paragraph shall be tried by preference
and in a summary manner. The court may review the documents in-camera before
reaching a decision.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection precludes the public examination or
reproduction of any record or part of a record which is not confidential, proprietary,
or trade secret.
(2) Any insurer claiming that documents or information filed under the
provisions of this Section contain trade secrets shall file with the commissioner
a notice of request for nondisclosure on the basis of trade secret protection.
Failure to do so constitutes a waiver of any claim that the document or
information is a trade secret.
(3) A claim that information is subject to nondisclosure on the grounds
it is a trade secret shall meet all of the following conditions:
(a) It shall be information, including a formula, pattern, compilation,
program, device, method, technique, or process that derives independent
economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to and not
being readily ascertainable through proper means by other persons who can
obtain economic value from its disclosure or use, and is the subject of efforts
that are unreasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.
(b) Each page of a document or specific portion of a document claimed
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-484 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 297
to be a trade secret shall be clearly marked as "trade secret".
(c) All material marked as a trade secret shall be separated from all non-
trade secret material and submitted in a separate envelope or document clearly
marked as "trade secret".
(d) In submitting a notice of trade secret to the commissioner, the
submitting party shall include a sworn affidavit that states the basis for the
claim that the submission qualifies as a trade secret and attests to the truth of
all of the following:
(i) The affiant considers this information to be a trade secret that has
value and provides an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over
those who do not know or use it.
(ii) The affiant has taken measures to prevent the disclosure of the
information to anyone other than those who have been selected to have access
for limited purposes and the affiant continues to take those measures.
(iii) The information is and has not been reasonably obtainable by other
persons by use of legitimate means without the affiant's consent.
(iv) The information is not publicly available elsewhere, and the public
release of the information would cause actual, demonstrable harm to affiant.
(e) The submission shall include a summary prepared for the public
describing the nature of the submission claimed to be a trade secret without
disclosing the protected details of the submission.
(4) The following items shall not be considered a trade secret and shall
be subject to public disclosure:
(a) Any financial information, including data, models, or assumptions,
used in the calculation or justification for insurance rates.
(b) All transactions between an insurer and any affiliate including but
not limited to fees, commissions, payments, or profit-sharing agreements with
managing general agents, claims adjusters, reinsurers, or third-party
administrators.
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-484 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 297
(c) Office and employee compensation.
(d) Dividends paid to shareholders.
(e) Any information contained in rate filings.
(f) Any information used to support or oppose proposed legislation.
(g) The summary prepared in accordance with Subparagraph (3)(e) of
this Subsection.
(5) The commissioner shall review all claims of trade secret protection
submitted pursuant to this Section. If the commissioner determines that the
information does not meet the definition of a trade secret pursuant to this
Section or falls within the categories provided for in Paragraph (4) of this
Subsection, the claim shall be denied, and the commissioner shall issue a written
notice of denial to the submitting party.
(6) The commissioner shall, at least once every other year, contract with
an independent third-party entity with expertise in insurance regulation to
conduct an independent review of trade secret claims submitted pursuant to this
Subsection. The contract shall require submission of a final report to the
commissioner, the president of the Senate, and the speaker of the House of
Representatives no later than February 1 of the year following the year in which
a review is conducted identifying any trade secret claims the third-party entity
recommends be rejected by the commissioner.
(7) Any person who knowingly asserts a false claim of trade secret
protection in order to conceal unlawful financial practices shall be subject to a
fine imposed by the commissioner in an amount not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars per violation and suspension or revocation of any certificate
of authority or insurance license held by that person.
* * *
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-484 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 297